Arkansas, session 2025, SB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 38, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-38-208. Automated teller machine impairment.
(a)(1) As used in this section, "automated teller machine" means an
electronic information processing device located in this state that accepts
or dispenses cash in connection with a financial transaction or credit card.
(2) "Automated teller machine" includes a customer-bank
communication terminal.
(b) A person commits automated teller machine impairment if he or she
purposely:
(1) Removes an automated teller machine; or
(2) Causes impairment or interruption of use, in whole or in
part, of an automated teller machine.
(c) Automated teller machine impairment is a Class D felony.




*ANS324*
03/18/2025 4:17:38 PM ANS324